Mississippi, session 2026, SB3394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jerlean Cummings of Clay County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of false pretenses on July 18, 1997, in Clay County, Mississippi.  On January 22, 2025, the Mississippi Department of Corrections represented that after a complete search of its records, the department was unable to locate any information other than Jerlean Cummings' Inmate Time Sheet.     Cummings represents that she was finally discharged from the department on completion of her sentence, and her Inmate Time Sheet reflects an end date of July 18, 2000. She completed all terms and conditions of her sentence. The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.